Louisiana, session 2026, SB127.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Art. 4566(C) is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
Art. 4566. Management of affairs of the interdict
* * *
C. A curator may accept donations made to the interdict. A curator shall not
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 127 ENROLLED
make donations of the property of the interdict except as provided by law. A
charitable donation inter vivos or testamentary charitable disposition made in
compliance with the provisions of R.S. 9:1026 and approved by the court shall
not constitute a breach of the fiduciary duty or conflict of interest by the
curator even if the curator, undercurator, parent, direct descendant, sibling, or
descendant of a sibling of the interdict is affiliated with the charity or a
recipient of the donation. A curator without court approval may refuse,
renounce, or disclaim a donation, inheritance, or bequest made to an interdict
with a direct or beneficial net worth as a trust beneficiary or otherwise of one
hundred million dollars or more.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 9:1026 and 2374 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1026. Interdicts; donations; limitations; net worth
A. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 9:1022 through 1024 and
pursuant to Subsection C of this Section, upon request of the curator and
undercurator, the court may authorize a curator, in the name of and on behalf
of an interdict with a direct or beneficial net worth of one hundred million
dollars or more as a trust beneficiary or otherwise, to make the following
donations:
(1) Subject to Paragraph (2) of this Subsection and Subsection C of this
Section, other than to charitable recipients, an interdict may make, directly or
indirectly, donations inter vivos of money and other assets from surplus funds
of the interdict utilizing all or a portion of the interdict's annual federal gift tax
exclusions pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 2503(b) and the interdict's lifetime credits and
exemptions from federal estate tax and the tax on generation skipping transfers,
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 2010 and 2631 et seq., to one or more of the following: an
interdict's direct descendant, sibling, descendant of a sibling, stepsibling,
descendant of a stepsibling, or step-descendant of a sibling, or to one or more
trusts for the benefit of the recipient or one or more class trusts for the benefit
of such present and future recipients, including to grantor trusts. Additional
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 127 ENROLLED
donations inter vivos pursuant to this Paragraph may be made, except to a
stepsibling, descendant of a stepsibling, step-descendant of a sibling, or a trust
for the benefit of a stepsibling or step-descendant of a sibling, subject to a
maximum lifetime limit of five times the prevailing federal estate tax lifetime
exemption equivalent.
(2) Inter vivos noncharitable donations authorized in Paragraph (1) of
this Subsection in the name or on behalf of an interdict shall be made in equal
amounts to each member of the same class and generation descending from a
common parent. Inter vivos noncharitable donations authorized in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection and made to nieces and nephews, including step-nieces and
step-nephews, with the same parent shall be made equally to each descendant
of that parent of the same generation.
(3) If the federal gift tax has been repealed, cumulative inter vivos
transfers otherwise authorized in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection are
permitted subject to an aggregate lifetime amount equal to six hundred percent
of the highest gift tax lifetime exemption in effect prior to the gift tax being
repealed. Annual exclusion donations may be made subject to the provisions of
this Section after donations in the maximum allowable amounts pursuant to
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(4) Noncharitable testamentary dispositions made upon the death of the
interdict, other than through intestacy, including a self-settled trust in which the
interdict is a beneficiary may only be made to a direct descendant, sibling,
descendant of a sibling of an interdict, one or more trusts for the benefit of such
recipients, or one or more class trusts for the benefit of such present and future
recipients, including to grantor trusts, but may not be made to a stepsibling,
descendant of a stepsibling, or trust for the benefit of such recipient.
Testamentary dispositions pursuant to this Paragraph shall be made in equal
amounts to recipients of the same class and generation, except that a catch-up
bequest may be made to an interdict's direct descendant, sibling, or descendant
of a sibling to equalize a donation to a permissible recipient born after inter
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 127 ENROLLED
vivos donations were made to other recipients of the same degree.
(5) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to annul or supersede a
lawful will or trust in effect prior to a person being interdicted.
(6) Inter vivos charitable dispositions may be made to charitable
recipients, including split interest trusts, donor-advised funds, charitable trusts,
and private foundations, even if such donees are controlled by a parent, direct
descendant, sibling, or descendant of a sibling of an interdict, up to a maximum
annual aggregate amount of ten percent of the interdict's net worth in excess of
one hundred million dollars. An inter vivos charitable disposition pursuant to
this Paragraph shall not be allowed if the interdict's net worth is less than one
hundred million dollars.
B. Inter vivos donations, testamentary and charitable dispositions,
including a charitable remainder trust, to one or more charities may be made
that take effect upon the death of the interdict provided that such charitable
donations shall not exceed an aggregate of seventy-five percent of the interdict's
gross estate at the time of his death for federal estate tax reporting purposes.
C.(1) The court may authorize a curator to make a donation pursuant
to Subsection A of this Section when the procedure provided for in Code of Civil
Procedure Articles 4271 and 4566 is complied with and the donation does not
materially impair the financial condition of the interdict and is not likely to
deprive the interdict of sufficient funds to provide for his future needs and
support. The court may require the curator to provide documentation to
substantiate the request to make a donation and place the information obtained
under seal.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, it is presumed that a donation does
not materially impair the financial condition of the interdict or deprive the
interdict of sufficient resources if the curator shows that the direct or beneficial
net worth of the interdict is not less than one hundred million dollars as a trust
beneficiary or otherwise, after subtracting the value of the donation.
* * *
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 127 ENROLLED
§2374. Forced heirs; disability; forced portion; limitations; net worth
Notwithstanding the provisions of Civil Code Article 1495, a forced heir
who has attained the age of majority, is permanently incapable of taking care
of his person or administering his estate due to mental incapacity, physical
infirmity, an inherited incurable disease, or other documented medical
condition at the time of the death of a decedent who is an ancestor of such
forced heir, and who has a direct or beneficial net worth in excess of fifty
million dollars as a trust beneficiary or otherwise, shall have a forced portion
of one dollar.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.